New York, session 2025-2026, A4360.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "cannabis oversight and official engagement act". 3 § 2. The cannabis law is amended by adding a new section 76-a to read 4 as follows: 5 § 76-a. Notification to elected officials of adult-use retail dispen- 6 sary license. 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the 7 following terms shall have the following meanings: 8 (a) "Adult-use retail dispensary license" means an adult-use retail 9 dispensary license issued pursuant to section seventy-two of this arti- 10 cle. 11 (b) "Elected official" means the elected member of the assembly or 12 senate representing a legislative district. 13 (c) "Legislative district" means an assembly or senate district in the 14 state, as designated by the most recently approved districting or redis- 15 tricting plan. 16 2. Notice requirement. (a) Prior to the approval of any application 17 for an adult-use retail dispensary license, the office shall notify the 18 elected officials representing the legislative districts within which 19 the proposed adult-use retail dispensary would be located of such appli- 20 cation. Such notice shall be sent no later than thirty days before a 21 decision is made regarding such application. Such notice shall be sent 22 by certified mail, electronic mail, or any other method deemed reliable 23 by the office. 24 (b) The notice required under paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall 25 include: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08736-01-5 A. 4360 2 1 (i) the trade name and address of the proposed adult-use retail 2 dispensary; 3 (ii) the full name and contact information of the applicant; 4 (iii) a summary of the proposed operation and business model of the 5 proposed adult-use retail dispensary; 6 (iv) the date, to be determined by the office, by which the elected 7 officials may submit any comments or objections regarding the applica- 8 tion for an adult-use retail dispensary license; and 9 (v) any other information as may be determined by the office. 10 3. Response from elected officials. Elected officials may submit to 11 the office any written feedback, support, concerns, or objections they 12 may have regarding an application for an adult-use retail dispensary 13 license within twenty days of receipt of the notice sent pursuant to 14 subdivision two of this section. The office shall consider any such 15 written feedback, support, concerns, or objections submitted by elected 16 officials in making its decision to approve or reject an application for 17 an adult-use retail dispensary license. 18 4. Record and transparency. All communications between the office and 19 elected officials pursuant to this section shall be a part of the public 20 record, subject to any applicable state or federal laws concerning 21 privacy and confidentiality. The office shall publish all such communi- 22 cations and its final decision regarding any application for an adult- 23 use retail dispensary on its website. 24 5. Rules and regulations. The office is authorized to promulgate any 25 rules and/or regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this 26 section. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to all 28 applications for adult-use retail dispensary licenses submitted to the 29 office of cannabis management on or after such date.